District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

33-419

Duty of partners to render information.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 27, 1962, 76 Stat. 640, Pub. L. 87-709, § 20
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 1203, 44 DCR 777

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 41-119.
1973 Ed., § 41-319.